test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-4lex_kunagas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kunâgâs: # MLO, ok
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Nom: kunâgâs
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Gen: kunâgâs
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Acc: kunâgâs
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Ill: kunâgâsân
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Loc: kunâgâsâst
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Com: kunâgâssáin
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Abe: kunâgâsttáá
    kunâgâs+N+Ess: kunâgâssân
    kunâgâs+N+Par: kunâgâssâd
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Nom: kunâgâsah
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Gen: kunâgâsâi
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Acc: kunâgâsâid
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Ill: kunâgâssáid
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Loc: kunâgâsâin
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Com: kunâgâsâiguin
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Abe: kunâgâsâittáá
    
  Noun - káránâs: # MLO, ok
    káránâs+N+Sg+Nom: káránâs
    káránâs+N+Sg+Gen: káránâs
    káránâs+N+Sg+Acc: káránâs
    káránâs+N+Sg+Ill: káránâsân
    káránâs+N+Sg+Loc: káránâsâst
    káránâs+N+Sg+Com: káránâssáin
    káránâs+N+Sg+Abe: káránâsttáá
    káránâs+N+Ess: káránâssân
    káránâs+N+Par: káránâssâd
    káránâs+N+Pl+Nom: káránâsah
    káránâs+N+Pl+Gen: káránâsâi
    káránâs+N+Pl+Acc: káránâsâid
    káránâs+N+Pl+Ill: káránâssáid
    káránâs+N+Pl+Loc: káránâsâin
    káránâs+N+Pl+Com: káránâsâiguin
    káránâs+N+Pl+Abe: káránâsâittáá

  Noun - siäpulâs: # MLO, ok
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Nom: siäˊpulâs
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Gen: siäˊpulâs
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Acc: siäˊpulâs
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Ill: siäˊpulâsân
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Loc: siäˊpulâsâst
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Com: siäˊpulâssáin
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Abe: siäˊpulâsttáá
    siäpulâs+N+Ess: siäˊpulâssân
    siäpulâs+N+Par: siäˊpulâssâd
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Nom: siäˊpulâsah
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Gen: siäˊpulâsâi
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Acc: siäˊpulâsâid
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Ill: siäˊpulâssáid
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Loc: siäˊpulâsâin
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Com: siäˊpulâsâiguin
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Abe: siäˊpulâsâittáá

  Noun - čuojânâs: # MLO, ok
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Nom: čuoˊjânâs
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Gen: čuoˊjânâs
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Acc: čuoˊjânâs
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Ill: čuoˊjânâsân
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Loc: čuoˊjânâsâst
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Com: čuoˊjânâssáin
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Abe: čuoˊjânâsttáá
    čuojânâs+N+Ess: čuoˊjânâssân
    čuojânâs+N+Par: čuoˊjânâssâd
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Nom: čuoˊjânâsah
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Gen: čuoˊjânâsâi
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Acc: čuoˊjânâsâid
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Ill: čuoˊjânâssáid
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Loc: čuoˊjânâsâin
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Com: čuoˊjânâsâiguin
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Abe: čuoˊjânâsâittáá

    
  Noun - komserjâs: # MLO, ok
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Nom: komserjâs
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Gen: komserjâs
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Acc: komserjâs
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Ill: komserjâsân
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Loc: komserjâsâst
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Com: komserjâssáin
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Abe: komserjâsttáá
    komserjâs+N+Ess: komserjâssân
    komserjâs+N+Par: komserjâssâd
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Nom: komserjâsah
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Gen: komserjâsâi
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Acc: komserjâsâid
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Ill: komserjâssáid
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Loc: komserjâsâin
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Com: komserjâsâiguin
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Abe: komserjâsâittáá

  Noun - sopâmuš: # MLO, ok
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Nom: sopâmuš
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Gen: sopâmuš
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Acc: sopâmuš
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Ill: sopâmušân
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Loc: sopâmušâst
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Com: sopâmuššáin
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Abe: sopâmušttáá
    sopâmuš+N+Ess: sopâmuššân
    sopâmuš+N+Par: sopâmuššâd
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Nom: sopâmušah
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Gen: sopâmušâi
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Acc: sopâmušâid
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Ill: sopâmuššáid
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Loc: sopâmušâin
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Com: sopâmušâiguin
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Abe: sopâmušâittáá
    
  Noun - purrâmâš: # MLO, ok purrâmuš and purrâmuš are both very common and accepted; dialectological variants
    purrâmâš+N+Sg+Nom: [purrâmâš, purrâmuš]
    purrâmâš+N+Sg+Gen: [purrâmâš, purrâmuš]
    purrâmâš+N+Sg+Acc: [purrâmâš, purrâmuš]
    purrâmâš+N+Sg+Ill: [purrâmâšân, purrâmušân]
    purrâmâš+N+Sg+Loc: [purrâmâšâst, purrâmušâst]
    purrâmâš+N+Sg+Com: [purrâmâššáin, purrâmuššáin]
    purrâmâš+N+Sg+Abe: [purrâmâšttáá, purrâmušttáá]
    purrâmâš+N+Ess: [purrâmâššân, purrâmuš]
    purrâmâš+N+Par: [purrâmâššâd, purrâmuššâd]
    purrâmâš+N+Pl+Nom: [purrâmâšah, purrâmušah]
    purrâmâš+N+Pl+Gen: [purrâmâšâi, purrâmušâi]
    purrâmâš+N+Pl+Acc: [purrâmâšâid, purrâmušâid]
    purrâmâš+N+Pl+Ill: [purrâmâššáid, purrâmuššáid]
    purrâmâš+N+Pl+Loc: [purrâmâšâin, purrâmušâin]
    purrâmâš+N+Pl+Com: [purrâmâšâiguin, purrâmušâiguin]
    purrâmâš+N+Pl+Abe: [purrâmâšâittáá, purrâmušâittáá]
